Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1936
Tax certificate
foreclosure proceedings; authority of governmental subdivisions to convey
real property obtained thereunder.

When any county,
city, village, school district, drainage district, or irrigation district shall have acquired
real estate under such tax foreclosure proceedings, the governing body of
such governmental subdivision or municipal corporation shall have power to
convey any such real estate by a deed signed by the chairperson or
other presiding officer of such body, subject to the right, if any, of any
person, persons, firm, corporation, or governmental body to attack the same
by action or proceeding within the one-year limitation provided in sections 77-1934 to 77-1936, for such
price as the governing body of any such governmental subdivision or municipal
corporation, in the exercise of good faith, shall determine to be a fair and
reasonable price for the property.

Laws 1947, c. 264, § 4, p. 856;

Laws 2013, LB341, § 19.